Hawaii, session 2026, GM1113.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII:
SECTION 1. The legislature finds that military families
face unique challenges stemming from the demands of military
life, including frequent relocations, short-notice deployments,
and other service-related obligations. These disruptions often
result in financial stress, food insecurity, and urgent needs
for time off from work to manage essential responsibilities such
as arranging childcare, attending military briefings, securing
legal and financial services, and ensuring continuity of care
for dependents.
The legislature further finds that Hawaii's family leave
law does not currently recognize qualifying exigencies
experienced by family members of military service members as a
permissible reason for family leave. Aligning Hawaii's family
leave law with the federal Family and Medical Leave Act, which
acknowledges such exigencies, will provide critical support and
reinforce the State's commitment to those who serve.
2026-2422 SB3082 GDI SMA.docx 1
HIHMIIIIIIHMIIIinnflllil

Page 2 3082
S.B. NO.
S.D. 1
H.D. 1
C.D. 1
Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to strengthen
support for military families by expanding family leave
eligibility to include qualifying military exigencies.
SECTION 2. Section 398-1, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by adding a new definition to be appropriately inserted
and to read as follows:
"’’Qualifying military exigency" means a qualifying exigency
that is related to active duty service, as provided in title 29
Code of Federal Regulations section 825.126, by an employee's
child, spouse, reciprocal beneficiary, sibling, grandchild, or
parent in the United States armed forces."
SECTION 3. Section 398-3, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by amending subsection (a) to read as follows:
"(a) An employee shall be entitled to a total of four
weeks of family leave during any calendar year:
(1) Upon the birth of a child of the employee or the
adoption of a child; [ee]
(2) To care for the employee’s child, spouse, reciprocal
beneficiary, sibling, grandchild, or parent with a
serious health condition [-r] ; or
(3) For a qualifying military exigency."
2026-2422 SB3082 CDl SMA.docx 2
niiiinHHiliiiiiiniiii

Page 3
S.B. NO.
H.D. 1
C.D. 1
SECTION 4. Section 398-5, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended to read as follows:
”§398-5 Notice. In any case in which the necessity for
family leave for purposes of birth or adoption of a child [e^?]£
providing care to a child, spouse, reciprocal beneficiary,
sibling, or parent; or qualifying military exigency is
foreseeable, the employee shall provide the employer with prior
notice of the expected birth or adoption serious health
condition, or qualifying military exigency in a manner that is
reasonable and practicable. Requests for family leave shall
include evidence that the employee has submitted the request and
provided required data in accordance with section 398-9.5."
SECTION 5. Section 398-6, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended to read as follows:
"§398-6 Certification. (a) An employer may require that
a claim for family leave be supported by written certification.
(b) For the birth of a child, certification shall be
issued by a health care provider or the family court. For the
placement of a child for adoption with the employee,
certification shall be issued by a recognized adoption agency,
the attorney handling the adoption, or by the individual
2026-2422 SB3082 CDl SMA.docx 3
iiMiiiiiniinmnwii

S.B. NO.
C.D. 1
officially designated by the birth parent to select and approve
the adoptive family.
(c) When leave is to care for a child, spouse, reciprocal
beneficiary, sibling, grandchild, or parent who has a serious
health condition, certification shall be issued by the health
care provider of the individual requiring care. Certification
shall be considered sufficient if it provides information as
required by the director.
(d) When leave is for a qualifying military exigency,
documentation shall include a copy of official military orders."
SECTION 6. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed
and stricken. New statutory material is underscored.
SECTION 7. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
2026-2422 SB3082 CDl SMA.docx 4

S.B. NO. ""
I
ch
d
Q
Q
Q
APPROVED this 19th day of May ,2026
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF HAWAII

S.B. No. 3082, S.D. 1, H.D. 1, C.D. 1
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAW API
Date: April 30, 2026
Honolulu, Hawai‘i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Final Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2026.
ident of the Senate
Clerk of the Senate
5-26

SB No. 3082, SD 1,HD 1,CD 1
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date: April 30, 2026
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Final Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of2026.
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives